Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.080

Powers of judges of supreme and superior courts.

The judges of the supreme and superior courts have power in any part of the state to take and certify—

(1) The proof and acknowledgment of a conveyance of real property or any other written instrument authorized or required to be proved or acknowledged.

(2) The acknowledgment of satisfaction of a judgment in any court.

(3) An affidavit or deposition to be used in any court of justice or other tribunal of this state.

(4) To exercise any other power and perform any other duty conferred or imposed upon them by statute.

[ 1891 c 54 s 8; RRS s 59.]

NOTES:

Who may take acknowledgments: RCW 64.08.010.